Rhode Island, session 2025, SB953.
It is enacted by the General Assembly as follows:
SECTION 1. Section 17-20-18 of the General Laws in Chapter 17-20 entitled "Mail
Ballots" is hereby amended to read as follows:
17-20-18. Instructions on ballot.
The secretary of state may, if the secretary deems necessary, cause to be printed at the head
of the ballot brief instructions for voting and the use of the ballot. The mail Mail ballots shall, in
addition to the official endorsement provided by law, bear the words: “Mail voters”, except for
those ballots cast in conformance with § 17-20-2.2(g).
SECTION 2. This act shall take effect upon passage.
========
LC001331
========